Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 4. Administration of Chapter; Sale, Etc., of Condominium Units.
§ 55.1-1983.
Escrow of deposits.

Any deposit made in regard to any disposition of a unit, including a nonbinding reservation agreement, shall be held in escrow until delivered at settlement. Such escrow funds shall be deposited in a separate account designated for this purpose that is federally insured and located in the Commonwealth, except where such deposits are being held by a real estate broker or attorney licensed under the laws of the Commonwealth, in which case such funds may be placed in that broker’s or attorney’s regular escrow account and need not be placed in a separate designated account. Such escrow funds shall not be subject to attachment by the creditors of either the purchaser or the declarant.

In lieu of escrowing deposits as provided in subsection A, the declarant of a condominium consisting of more than 50 units may:

Obtain and maintain a corporate surety bond issued by a surety authorized to do business in the Commonwealth, in the form and amount set forth below; or

Obtain and maintain an irrevocable letter of credit issued by a financial institution whose accounts are insured by the FDIC, in the form and amount set forth below.The surety bond or letter of credit shall be maintained until (i) the granting of a deed to the unit, (ii) the purchaser’s default under a purchase contract for the unit entitling the declarant to retain the deposit, or (iii) the refund of the deposit to the purchaser, whichever occurs first.

The surety bond shall be payable to the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of every person protected under the provisions of this chapter. The declarant shall file the bond with the Common Interest Community Board. The surety bond may be either in the form of an individual bond for each deposit accepted by the declarant or, if the total amount of the deposits accepted by the declarant under this chapter exceeds $10,000, it may be in the form of a blanket bond. If the bond is a blanket bond, the amount shall be as follows. If the amount of such deposits is:

$75,000 or less, the blanket bond shall be $75,000;

More than $75,000 but less than $200,000, the blanket bond shall be $200,000;

$200,000 or more but less than $500,000, the blanket bond shall be $500,000;

$500,000 or more but less than $1 million, the blanket bond shall be $1 million; and

$1 million or more, the blanket bond shall be 100 percent of the amount of such deposits.

The letter of credit shall be payable to the Commonwealth for use and benefit of every person protected under this chapter. The declarant shall file the letter of credit with the Common Interest Community Board. The letter of credit may be either in the form of an individual letter of credit for each deposit accepted by the declarant or, if the total amount of the deposits accepted by the declarant under this chapter exceeds $10,000, it may be in the form of a blanket letter of credit. If the letter of credit is a blanket letter of credit, the amount shall be as follows. If the amount of such deposits is:

$75,000 or less, the blanket letter of credit shall be $75,000;

More than $75,000 but less than $200,000, the blanket letter of credit shall be $200,000;

$200,000 or more but less than $500,000, the blanket letter of credit shall be $500,000;

$500,000 or more but less than $1 million, the blanket letter of credit shall be $1 million; and

$1 million or more, the blanket letter of credit shall be 100 percent of the amount of such deposits.For the purposes of determining the amount of any blanket letter of credit that a declarant maintains in any calendar year, the total amount of deposits considered held by the declarant shall be determined as of May 31 in each calendar year and the amount of the letter of credit shall be in accordance with the amount of deposits held as of May 31.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.95; 1977, c. 91; 2007, c. 445; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1984.
Declarant to deliver declaration to purchaser.

The declarant shall within 10 days of recordation of the condominium instruments as provided for in §§

55.1-1907

and

55.1-1911

forward to each purchaser at his last known address by first-class mail, return receipt requested, an exact copy of the recorded declaration and bylaws.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.96; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1985.
Investigations and proceedings.

Whenever the Common Interest Community Board receives a written complaint that appears to state a valid claim, the Common Interest Community Board shall make necessary public or private investigations in accordance with law within or outside of the Commonwealth to determine whether any declarant or its agents, employees, or other representatives have violated or are about to violate this chapter or any Common Interest Community Board regulation or order, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of Common Interest Community Board regulations and forms. The Common Interest Community Board may also in like manner and with like authority investigate written complaints against persons other than the declarant or its agents, employees, or other representatives.

For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the Common Interest Community Board or any officer designated by regulation may administer oaths or affirmations and upon its own motion or upon request of any party shall subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any matter that is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of any books, documents, or other tangible things and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of material evidence.

Upon failure to obey a subpoena or to answer questions propounded by the investigating officer and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected by such failure, the Common Interest Community Board may apply to the Circuit Court of the County of Henrico for an order compelling compliance.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.99; 1993, c. 198; 2011, c. 605; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1986.
Cease and desist orders.

The Common Interest Community Board may issue an order requiring a person to cease and desist from any of the unlawful practices enumerated in subdivisions 1 through 5 and to take such affirmative action as in the judgment of the Common Interest Community Board will carry out the purposes of this chapter if the Common Interest Community Board determines after notice and hearing that such person has:

Violated any provision of this chapter;

Directly or through an agent or employee knowingly engaged in any false, deceptive, or misleading advertising, promotional, or sales methods to offer or dispose of a unit;

Made any substantial change in the plan of disposition and development of the condominium subsequent to the order of registration without notifying the Common Interest Community Board;

Disposed of any units that have not been registered with the Common Interest Community Board; or

Violated any lawful order or regulation of the Common Interest Community Board.

If the Common Interest Community Board makes a finding of fact in writing that the public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an order, it may issue a temporary order to cease and desist or to take such affirmative action as may be deemed appropriate by the Common Interest Community Board. Prior to issuing the temporary order, the Common Interest Community Board shall give notice of the proposal to issue a temporary order to the person. Every temporary order shall include in its terms a provision that upon request a hearing will be held promptly to determine whether it becomes permanent.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.100; 1975, c. 415; 2019, cc. 467, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 467 amended § 55-79.100 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in subsection B by substituting “temporary order to cease and desist or to take such affirmative action as may be deemed appropriate by the Common Interest Community Board” for “temporary cease and desist order” in the first sentence and “temporary order” for “temporary cease and desist order” throughout the second and third sentences.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1987.
Revocation of registration.

A registration may be revoked by the Common Interest Community Board after notice and hearing upon a written finding of fact in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) that the declarant has:

Failed to comply with the terms of a cease and desist order;

Been convicted in any court subsequent to the filing of the application for registration for a crime involving fraud, deception, false pretenses, misrepresentation, false advertising, or dishonest dealing in real estate transactions;

Disposed of, concealed, or diverted any funds or assets of any person so as to defeat the rights of unit purchasers;

Failed faithfully to perform any stipulation or agreement made with the Common Interest Community Board as an inducement to grant any registration, to reinstate any registration, or to approve any promotional plan or public offering statement; or

Made intentional misrepresentations or concealed material facts in an application for registration.

If the Common Interest Community Board finds after notice and a hearing that the developer has been guilty of a violation for which revocation could be ordered, it may issue a cease and desist order instead.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.101; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1988.
Judicial review.

Proceedings for judicial review shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.102; 1996, c. 573; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1989.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of §

55.1-1972

,

55.1-1974

,

55.1-1975

,

55.1-1976

,

55.1-1979

,

55.1-1982

, or

55.1-1983

or any regulation adopted under or order issued pursuant to §

55.1-1971

, or any person who willfully in an application for registration makes any untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be fined not less than $1,000 or double the amount of gain from the transaction, whichever is the larger, but not more than $50,000, or he may be imprisoned for not more than six months, or both, for each offense.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.103; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.